Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2376YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 232 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 70A.23A Credit for accrued sick 1 leave ââ retired public safety employees. 2 Notwithstanding section 70A.23, a public safety employee, 3 as defined in section 20.3, who retires and has applied for 4 retirement benefits under an eligible retirement system, shall 5 receive credit for all accumulated, unused sick leave which 6 shall be converted at one hundred percent of current value 7 and credited to an account for the public safety employee 8 for the purpose of paying the public safety employeeâs cost 9 of the monthly premiums for continuance of the public safety 10 employeeâs health insurance plan. Upon the death of a retired 11 public safety employee, the surviving spouse or dependents 12 shall be entitled to the value of the accumulated unused sick 13 leave for the purpose of paying the cost of monthly premiums 14 for continuation of a public safety employeeâs health insurance 15 policy for the public safety employeeâs surviving spouse or 16 dependents. This section does not apply to a public safety 17 employee covered under a collective bargaining agreement which 18 provides for an employer paid retirement health savings plan. 19